Connecticut, session 2026, HB05418.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 10a-19h of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2027):
(a) For the purposes of this section, "veterinary student" means an in-
state resident enrolled in an accredited veterinary graduate school.
(b) The president of The University of Connecticut shall establish and
administer the Kirklyn M. Kerr program to support the veterinary
medicine education of not more than five veterinary students per
cohort. Each cohort may be funded for a four-year period pursuant to
the provisions of subsection (c) of this section.
(c) Any state resident may apply, in the form and manner prescribed
by The University of Connecticut, for a grant to attend a veterinary
graduate school under the Kirklyn M. Kerr program. The university
shall award such grants within available appropriations. Each grant
recipient shall receive a grant for four years in the amount of the
difference between the cost of in-state tuition and out-of-state tuition at
the veterinary graduate school approved by the university under said
program. Such grant shall be issued in the form of a student loan that
LCO 1 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5418
shall (1) not be subject to repayment, and (2) be forgiven at a rate of
twenty per cent per annum over the course of five years, provided such
grant recipient, after graduating from veterinary school and completing
any subsequent professional training, is a state resident and practicing
veterinarian, licensed pursuant to chapter 384, working in the state.
Such student loan shall be subject to repayment for any remaining
balance of such student loan if a grant recipient ceases to be a state
resident or a practicing veterinarian in the state at any time during the
first five years after graduating from veterinary school and completing
any subsequent professional training.
(d) The University of Connecticut shall enter into a memorandum of
understanding with the Connecticut Higher Education Supplemental
Loan Authority for the issuance of forgivable student loans pursuant to
the provisions of subsection (c) of this section.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) The Office of Higher Education
shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with The University
of Connecticut for the use of funds in the Kirklyn M. Kerr account,
established pursuant to section 3 of this act, to award grants to
veterinary students under the Kirklyn M. Kerr program established
pursuant to section 10a-19h of the general statutes, as amended by this
act.
Sec. 3. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) There is established an account
to be known as the "Kirklyn M. Kerr account", which shall be a separate,
nonlapsing account. The account shall contain any moneys required by
law to be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account shall be
expended by the Office of Higher Education for the purposes of the
memorandum of understanding with The University of Connecticut
concerning the Kirklyn M. Kerr program, established pursuant to
section 10a-19h of the general statutes, as amended by this act.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2027 10a-19h
LCO 2 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5418
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 3 July 1, 2026 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
Section 1(c) was redrafted for clarity; and in Section 1(d), "establish" was
changed to "enter into" and in Section 2, "establish" was changed to
"enter into" for consistency with standard drafting conventions.
HED Joint Favorable Subst. C/R APP
APP Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 3 of 3